Louisiana, session 2026, HB857.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:4749.2(B)(introductory paragraph) and (1) and (D)(introductory
paragraph) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4749.2. Imported seafood; testing; penalties
* * *
B. Upon request of the department, the The processor or distributor shall:
(1) Provide any information, if available, on whether the seafood has
previously been tested in the country of origin or upon arrival in the United States
upon request of the department.
* * *
D. If the department has reason to believe a commercial seafood processor
or distributor is processing or distributing imported or commingled seafood packed
or labeled as domestic seafood, the department may test the seafood to ensure the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 857 ENROLLED
seafood is domestic. If the seafood is not domestic, the department may assess the
following civil penalties on the commercial seafood processor or distributor:
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.